Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
486D

PETROLEUM
PRODUCT ACCOUNTING ACT

REPEALED. L 1988, c 156, §2.

Cross References

Present provisions, see §§486-50 to 56.

Petroleum industry information reporting act, see chapter 486J.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next